test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_I_mitigwaab_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px2mitigwaab+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: gimitigwaabini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px2mitigwaab+PosPl+Pret+Loc: gimitigwaabiwaaibaning
     +Px2mitigwaab+PosPl+Pret+Obv: gimitigwaabiwaaibanan
     +Px2mitigwaab+PosPl+Pret+Pl: gimitigwaabiwaaibanag
     +Px2mitigwaab+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: gimitigwaabiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px2mitigwaab+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: gimitigwaabiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px2mitigwaab+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: gimitigwaabiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3mitigwaab+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: omitigwaabinaanibaning
     +Px3mitigwaab+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: omitigwaabinaanibanan
     +Px3mitigwaab+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: omitigwaabinaanibanag
     +Px3mitigwaab+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: omitigwaabinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3mitigwaab+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: omitigwaabinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3mitigwaab+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: omitigwaabinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3mitigwaab+PosObv+Pret+Loc: omitigwaabiniibaning
     +Px3mitigwaab+PosObv+Pret+Obv: omitigwaabiniibanan
     +Px3mitigwaab+PosObv+Pret+Pl: omitigwaabiniibanag
     +Px3mitigwaab+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: omitigwaabini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3mitigwaab+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: omitigwaabini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3mitigwaab+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: omitigwaabini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3mitigwaab+PosPl+Pret+Loc: omitigwaabiwaaibaning
     +Px3mitigwaab+PosPl+Pret+Obv: omitigwaabiwaaibanan
     +Px3mitigwaab+PosPl+Pret+Pl: omitigwaabiwaaibanag
     +Px3mitigwaab+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: omitigwaabiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3mitigwaab+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: omitigwaabiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3mitigwaab+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: omitigwaabiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: imitigwaabinaanibaning
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: imitigwaabinaanibanan
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: imitigwaabinaanibanag
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: imitigwaabinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: imitigwaabinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: imitigwaabinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+PosObv+Pret+Loc: imitigwaabiniibaning
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+PosObv+Pret+Obv: imitigwaabiniibanan
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+PosObv+Pret+Pl: imitigwaabiniibanag
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: imitigwaabini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: imitigwaabini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: imitigwaabini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+PosPl+Pret+Loc: imitigwaabiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+PosPl+Pret+Obv: imitigwaabiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+PosPl+Pret+Pl: imitigwaabiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: imitigwaabiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: imitigwaabiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: imitigwaabiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: mitigwaabenhimishinaan
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: mitigwaabenhimishini
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: mitigwaabenhimishiwaa
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: mitigwaabensimishinaan
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: mitigwaabensimishini
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: mitigwaabensimishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret: mitigwaabenhimishiban
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl: mitigwaabenhimish***idig, idog***
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret: mitigwaabensimishiban
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl: mitigwaabensimish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 7
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: mitigwaabenhimishing
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+Obv: mitigwaabenhimishan
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: mitigwaabenhimishag
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: mitigwaabensimishing
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+Obv: mitigwaabensimishan
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: mitigwaabensimishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: mitigwaabenhiminaaniban
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: mitigwaabenhiminaan***idig, idog***
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret: mitigwaabenhiminiiban
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: mitigwaabenhimini***idig, idog***
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret: mitigwaabenhimiwaaiban
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: mitigwaabenhimiwaa***idig, idog***
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret: mitigwaabensiminaaniban
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl: mitigwaabensiminaan***idig, idog***
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret: mitigwaabensiminiiban
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl: mitigwaabensimini***idig, idog***
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret: mitigwaabensimiwaaiban
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl: mitigwaabensimiwaa***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 7
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: mitigwaabenhiminaaning
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: mitigwaabenhiminaanan
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: mitigwaabenhiminaanag
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+PosObv+Loc: mitigwaabenhiminiing
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+PosObv+Obv: mitigwaabenhiminian
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pl: mitigwaabenhiminiag
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+PosPl+Loc: mitigwaabenhimiwaaing
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+PosPl+Obv: mitigwaabenhimiwaaan
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pl: mitigwaabenhimiwaaag
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: mitigwaabensiminaaning
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Obv: mitigwaabensiminaanan
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pl: mitigwaabensiminaanag
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Loc: mitigwaabensiminiing
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Obv: mitigwaabensiminian
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pl: mitigwaabensiminiag
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Loc: mitigwaabensimiwaaing
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Obv: mitigwaabensimiwaaan
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pl: mitigwaabensimiwaaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 6, 7
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: mitigwaabenhimibaning
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: mitigwaabenhimibanan
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: mitigwaabenhimibanag
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+VocPl+Loc: mitigwaabenhim***idig, idog***ing
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+VocPl+Obv: mitigwaabenhim***idig, idog***an
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos+VocPl+Pl: mitigwaabenhim***idig, idog***ag
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pret+Loc: mitigwaabensimibaning
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pret+Obv: mitigwaabensimibanan
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+Pret+Pl: mitigwaabensimibanag
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Loc: mitigwaabensim***idig, idog***ing
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Obv: mitigwaabensim***idig, idog***an
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Pl: mitigwaabensim***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: mitigwaabenhishinaaniban
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: mitigwaabenhishinaan***idig, idog***
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret: mitigwaabenhishiniiban
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: mitigwaabenhishini***idig, idog***
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret: mitigwaabenhishiwaaiban
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: mitigwaabenhishiwaa***idig, idog***
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: mitigwaabensishinaaniban
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: mitigwaabensishinaan***idig, idog***
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret: mitigwaabensishiniiban
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: mitigwaabensishini***idig, idog***
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret: mitigwaabensishiwaaiban
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: mitigwaabensishiwaa***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 7
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: mitigwaabenhishinaaning
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: mitigwaabenhishinaanan
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: mitigwaabenhishinaanag
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+PosObv+Loc: mitigwaabenhishiniing
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+PosObv+Obv: mitigwaabenhishinian
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pl: mitigwaabenhishiniag
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+PosPl+Loc: mitigwaabenhishiwaaing
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+PosPl+Obv: mitigwaabenhishiwaaan
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pl: mitigwaabenhishiwaaag
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: mitigwaabensishinaaning
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: mitigwaabensishinaanan
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: mitigwaabensishinaanag
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Loc: mitigwaabensishiniing
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Obv: mitigwaabensishinian
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pl: mitigwaabensishiniag
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Loc: mitigwaabensishiwaaing
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Obv: mitigwaabensishiwaaan
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pl: mitigwaabensishiwaaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: mitigwaabenhishibaning
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: mitigwaabenhishibanan
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: mitigwaabenhishibanag
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+VocPl+Loc: mitigwaabenhish***idig, idog***ing
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+VocPl+Obv: mitigwaabenhish***idig, idog***an
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej+VocPl+Pl: mitigwaabenhish***idig, idog***ag
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: mitigwaabensishibaning
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: mitigwaabensishibanan
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: mitigwaabensishibanag
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Loc: mitigwaabensish***idig, idog***ing
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Obv: mitigwaabensish***idig, idog***an
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Pl: mitigwaabensish***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5, 6, 7
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: mitigwaabenhinaanibaning
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: mitigwaabenhinaanibanan
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: mitigwaabenhinaanibanag
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: mitigwaabenhinaan***idig, idog***ing
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: mitigwaabenhinaan***idig, idog***an
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: mitigwaabenhinaan***idig, idog***ag
     mitigwaab+Con+PosObv+Pret+Loc: mitigwaabenhiniibaning
     mitigwaab+Con+PosObv+Pret+Obv: mitigwaabenhiniibanan
     mitigwaab+Con+PosObv+Pret+Pl: mitigwaabenhiniibanag
     mitigwaab+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: mitigwaabenhini***idig, idog***ing
     mitigwaab+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: mitigwaabenhini***idig, idog***an
     mitigwaab+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: mitigwaabenhini***idig, idog***ag
     mitigwaab+Con+PosPl+Pret+Loc: mitigwaabenhiwaaibaning
     mitigwaab+Con+PosPl+Pret+Obv: mitigwaabenhiwaaibanan
     mitigwaab+Con+PosPl+Pret+Pl: mitigwaabenhiwaaibanag
     mitigwaab+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: mitigwaabenhiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     mitigwaab+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: mitigwaabenhiwaa***idig, idog***an
     mitigwaab+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: mitigwaabenhiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: mitigwaabensinaanibaning
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: mitigwaabensinaanibanan
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: mitigwaabensinaanibanag
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: mitigwaabensinaan***idig, idog***ing
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: mitigwaabensinaan***idig, idog***an
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: mitigwaabensinaan***idig, idog***ag
     mitigwaab+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Loc: mitigwaabensiniibaning
     mitigwaab+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Obv: mitigwaabensiniibanan
     mitigwaab+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Pl: mitigwaabensiniibanag
     mitigwaab+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: mitigwaabensini***idig, idog***ing
     mitigwaab+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: mitigwaabensini***idig, idog***an
     mitigwaab+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: mitigwaabensini***idig, idog***ag
     mitigwaab+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Loc: mitigwaabensiwaaibaning
     mitigwaab+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Obv: mitigwaabensiwaaibanan
     mitigwaab+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Pl: mitigwaabensiwaaibanag
     mitigwaab+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: mitigwaabensiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     mitigwaab+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: mitigwaabensiwaa***idig, idog***an
     mitigwaab+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: mitigwaabensiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6
     mitigwaab+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: mitigwaabimishinaaniban
     mitigwaab+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: mitigwaabimishinaan***idig, idog***
     mitigwaab+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: mitigwaabimishiniiban
     mitigwaab+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: mitigwaabimishini***idig, idog***
     mitigwaab+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: mitigwaabimishiwaaiban
